Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB70.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 to 13 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Partition of Heirs Property Act.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 13 of this Act:
(1) "Ascendant" means an individual who precedes another individual in lineage, in
the direct line of ascent from the other individual;
(2) "Collateral" means an individual who is related to another individual under the
law of intestate succession of this Commonwealth but who is not the other
individual's ascendant or descendant;
(3) "Descendant" means an individual who follows another individual in lineage, in
the direct line of descent from the other individual;
(4) "Determination of value" means a court order determining the fair market value
of heirs property under Section 6 or 10 of this Act or adopting the valuation of
the property agreed to by all cotenants;
(5) "Heirs property" means real property held in tenancy in common which satisfies
all the following requirements of the filing of a partition action:
(a) There is no agreement in a record binding all the cotenants which governs
the partition of the property;
(b) One (1) or more of the cotenants acquired title from a relative, whether
living or deceased; and
(c) Any of the following applies:
1. Twenty percent (20%) or more of the interests are held by cotenants
who are relatives;
Page 1 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
2. Twenty percent (20%) or more of the interests are held by an
individual who acquired title from a relative, whether living or
deceased; or
3. Twenty percent (20%) or more of the cotenants are relatives;
(6) "Partition by sale" means a court-ordered sale of the entire heirs property,
whether by auction, sealed bids, or open-market sale conducted under Section 10
of this Act;
(7) "Partition in kind" means the division of heirs property into physically distinct
and separately titled parcels;
(8) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is
stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;
and
(9) "Relative" means ascendant, descendant, or collateral, or an individual
otherwise related to another individual by blood, marriage, adoption, or law of
this Commonwealth other than Sections 1 to 13 of this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Sections 1 to 13 of this Act apply to partition actions filed on or after the effective
date of this Act.
(2) In an action to partition real property under this chapter, the court shall
determine whether the property is heirs property. If the court determines that the
property is heirs property, the property shall be partitioned under Sections 1 to 13
of this Act unless all of the cotenants otherwise agree in a record.
(3) Sections 1 to 13 of this Act supplement other provisions of this chapter and, if an
action is governed by Sections 1 to 13 of this Act, shall replace provisions that are
inconsistent with Sections 1 to 13 of this Act.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
Page 2 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Sections 1 to 13 of this Act do not limit or affect the method by which service of a
complaint in a partition action may be made.
(2) If the plaintiff in a partition action seeks an order of notice by publication and
the court determines that the property may be heirs property, the plaintiff, not
later than ten (10) days after the court's determination, shall post and maintain
while the action is pending a conspicuous sign on the property that is the subject
of the action. The sign shall state that the action has commenced and identify the
name and address of the court and the common designation by which the
property is known. The court may require the plaintiff to publish on the sign the
name of the plaintiff and the known defendants.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
If the court appoints commissioners under Section 17 of this Act, each commissioner,
in addition to the requirements and disqualifications applicable to commissioners
under this chapter, shall be disinterested and impartial and not a party to or a
participant in the action.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if the court
determines that the property that is the subject of a partition action is heirs
property, the court shall determine the fair market value of the property by
ordering an appraisal pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
(2) If all cotenants have agreed to the value of the property or to another method of
valuation, the court shall adopt that value or the value produced by the agreed
method of valuation.
(3) If the court determines that the evidentiary value of an appraisal is outweighed by
Page 3 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
the cost of the appraisal, the court, after an evidentiary hearing, shall determine
the fair market value of the property and send notice to the parties of the value.
(4) If the court orders an appraisal, the court shall appoint a disinterested real estate
appraiser licensed in this Commonwealth to determine the fair market value of
the property assuming sole ownership of the fee simple estate. On completion of
the appraisal, the appraiser shall file a sworn or verified appraisal with the court.
(5) If an appraisal is conducted pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, not later
than ten (10) days after the appraisal is filed, the court shall send notice to each
party with a known address, stating:
(a) The appraised fair market value of the property;
(b) That the appraisal is available at the county property valuation
administrator's office; and
(c) That a party may file with the court an objection to the appraisal not later
than thirty (30) days after the notice is sent, stating the grounds for the
objection.
(6) If an appraisal is filed with the court pursuant to subsection (4) of this section,
the court shall conduct a hearing to determine the fair market value of the
property not sooner than thirty (30) days after a copy of the notice of the
appraisal is sent to each party under subsection (5) of this section, whether or not
an objection to the appraisal is filed under subsection (5)(c) of this section. In
addition to the court-ordered appraisal, the court may consider any other
evidence of value offered by a party.
(7) After a hearing under subsection (6) of this section, but before considering the
merits of the partition action, the court shall determine the fair market value of
the property and send notice to the parties of the value.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 4 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
(1) If any cotenant requests partition by sale, after the determination of value under
Section 6 of this Act, the court shall send notice to the parties that any cotenant
except a cotenant that requested partition by sale may buy all the interests of the
cotenants that requested partition by sale.
(2) Not later than forty-five (45) days after the notice is sent under subsection (1) of
this section, any cotenant except a cotenant that requested partition by sale may
give notice to the court that it elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that
requested partition by sale.
(3) The purchase price for each of the interests of a cotenant that requested partition
by sale is the value of the entire parcel determined under Section 6 of this Act
multiplied by the cotenant's fractional ownership of the entire parcel.
(4) After expiration of the period in subsection (2) of this section, the following rules
apply:
(a) If only one (1) cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that
requested partition by sale, the court shall notify all the parties of that fact;
(b) If more than one (1) cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants
that requested partition by sale, the court shall allocate the right to buy
those interests among the electing cotenants based on each electing
cotenant's existing fractional ownership of the entire parcel divided by the
total existing fractional ownership of all cotenants electing to buy and send
notice to all the parties of that fact and of the price to be paid by each
electing cotenant; and
(c) If no cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested
partition by sale, the court shall send notice to all the parties of that fact and
resolve the partition action under subsections (1) and (2) of Section 8 of this
Act.
(5) If the court sends notice to the parties under subsection (4)(a) or (b) of this
Page 5 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
section, the court shall set a date, not sooner than sixty (60) days after the date
the notice was sent, by which electing cotenants shall pay their apportioned price
into court. After this date, the following rules apply:
(a) If all electing cotenants timely pay their apportioned price into court, the
court shall issue an order reallocating all the interests of the cotenants and
disburse the amounts held by the court to the persons entitled to them;
(b) If no electing cotenant timely pays its apportioned price, the court shall
resolve the partition action under subsections (1) and (2) of Section 8 of this
Act as if the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale were
not purchased; and
(c) If one (1) or more but not all of the electing cotenants fail to pay their
apportioned price on time, the court, on motion, shall give notice to the
electing cotenants that paid their apportioned price of the interest
remaining and the price for all that interest.
(6) Not later than twenty (20) days after the court gives notice pursuant to subsection
(5)(c) of this section, any cotenant that paid may elect to purchase all of the
remaining interest by paying the entire price into court. After the twenty (20) day
period, the following rules apply:
(a) If only one (1) cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the
court shall issue an order reallocating the remaining interest to that
cotenant. The court shall issue promptly an order reallocating the interests
of all of the cotenants and disburse the amounts held by it to the persons
entitled to them;
(b) If no cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court
shall resolve the partition action under subsections (1) and (2) of Section 8
of this Act as if the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale
were not purchased; and
Page 6 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
(c) If more than one (1) cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining
interest, the court shall reapportion the remaining interest among those
paying cotenants, based on each paying cotenant's original fractional
ownership of the entire parcel divided by the total original fractional
ownership of all cotenants that paid the entire price for the remaining
interest. The court shall issue promptly an order reallocating all of the
cotenants' interests, disburse the amounts held by it to the persons entitled
to them, and promptly refund any excess payment held by the court.
(7) Not later than forty-five (45) days after the court sends notice to the parties
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, any cotenant entitled to buy an interest
under this section may request the court to authorize the sale as part of the
pending action of the interests of the cotenants named as defendants and served
with the complaint but that did not appear in the action.
(8) If the court receives a timely request under subsection (7) of this section, the
court, after hearing, may deny the request or authorize the requested additional
sale on such terms as the court determines are fair and reasonable, subject to the
following limitations:
(a) A sale authorized under this subsection may occur only after the purchase
prices for all interests subject to sale under subsections (1) to (6) of this
section have been paid into court and those interests have been reallocated
among the cotenants as provided in those subsections; and
(b) The purchase price for the interest of a nonappearing cotenant is based on
the court's determination of value under Section 6 of this Act.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If all the interests of all cotenants that requested partition by sale are not
purchased by other cotenants pursuant to Section 7 of this Act, or if at the
Page 7 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
conclusion of the buyout under Section 7 of this Act a cotenant remains that has
requested partition in kind, the court shall order partition in kind unless the
court, after consideration of the factors listed in Section 9 of this Act, finds that
partition in kind will result in manifest prejudice to the cotenants as a group. In
considering whether to order partition in kind, the court shall approve a request
by two (2) or more parties to have their individual interests aggregated.
(2) If the court does not partition in kind under subsection (1) of this section, the
court shall order partition by sale pursuant to Section 10 of this Act or, if no
cotenant requested partition by sale, the court shall dismiss the action.
(3) If the court orders partition in kind pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the
court may require that one (1) or more cotenants pay one (1) or more other
cotenant amounts so that the payments, taken together with the value of the in-
kind distributions to the cotenants, will make the partition in kind just and
proportionate in value to the fractional interests held.
(4) If the court orders partition in kind, the court shall allocate to the cotenants that
are unknown, unable to be located, or the subject of a default judgment, if their
interests were not bought out pursuant to Section 7 of this Act, a part of the
property representing the combined interests of these cotenants as determined by
the court, and this part of the property shall remain undivided.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In determining under subsection (1) of Section 8 of this Act whether the partition
in kind would result in manifest prejudice to the cotenants as a group, the court
shall consider the following:
(a) Whether the heirs property practicably can be divided among the cotenants;
(b) Whether partition in kind would apportion the property in such a way that
the aggregate fair market value of the parcels resulting from the division
Page 8 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
would be materially less than the value of the property if it were sold as a
whole, taking into account the condition under which a court-ordered sale
likely would occur;
(c) Evidence of the collective duration of ownership or possession of the
property by a cotenant and one (1) or more predecessors in title or
predecessors in possession to the cotenant who are or were relatives of the
cotenant or each other;
(d) A cotenant's sentimental attachment to the property, including any
attachment arising because the property has ancestral or other unique or
special value to the cotenant;
(e) The lawful use being made of the property by a cotenant and the degree to
which the cotenant would be harmed if the cotenant could not continue the
same use of the property;
(f) The degree to which the cotenants have contributed their pro rata share of
the property taxes, insurance, and other expenses associated with
maintaining ownership of the property or have contributed to the physical
improvement, maintenance, or upkeep of the property; and
(g) Any other relevant factor.
(2) The court may not consider any one (1) factor in subsection (1) of this section to
be dispositive without weighing the totality of all relevant factors and
circumstances.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If the court orders a sale of heirs property, the sale shall be an open-market sale
unless the court finds that a sale by sealed bids or an auction would be more
economically advantageous and in the best interest of the cotenants as a group.
(2) If the court orders an open-market sale and the parties, not later than ten (10)
Page 9 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
days after the entry of the order, agree on a real estate broker licensed in this
Commonwealth to offer the property for sale, the court shall appoint the broker
and establish a reasonable commission. If the parties do not agree on a broker,
the court shall appoint a disinterested real estate broker licensed in this
Commonwealth to offer the property for sale and shall establish a reasonable
commission. The broker shall offer the property for sale in a commercially
reasonable manner at a price no lower than the determination of value and on
the terms and conditions established by the court.
(3) If the broker appointed under subsection (2) of this section obtains within a
reasonable time an offer to purchase the property for at least the determination of
value:
(a) The broker shall comply with the reporting requirements in Section 11 of
this Act; and
(b) The sale may be completed in accordance with the laws of this
Commonwealth that are not in conflict with Sections 1 to 13 of this Act.
(4) If the broker appointed under subsection (2) of this section does not obtain within
a reasonable time an offer to purchase the property for at least the determination
of value, the court, after hearing, may:
(a) Approve the highest outstanding offer, if any;
(b) Redetermine the value of the property and order that the property continue
to be offered for an additional time; or
(c) Order that the property be sold by sealed bids or at an auction.
(5) If the court orders a sale by sealed bids or an auction, the court shall set terms
and conditions of the sale. If the court orders an auction, the auction shall be
conducted under Section 18 of this Act.
(6) If a purchaser is entitled to a share of the proceeds of the sale, the purchaser
shall be entitled to a credit against the price in an amount equal to the
Page 10 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
purchaser's share of the proceeds.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Unless required to do so within a shorter time by this chapter, a broker appointed
under subsection (2) of Section 10 of this Act to offer heirs property for open-
market sale shall file a report with the court not later than seven (7) days after
receiving an offer to purchase the property for at least the value determined
under Section 6 or 10 of this Act.
(2) The report required by subsection (1) of this section shall contain the following
information:
(a) A description of the property to be sold to each buyer;
(b) The name of each buyer;
(c) The proposed purchase price;
(d) The terms and conditions of the proposed sale, including the terms of any
owner financing;
(e) The amounts to be paid to lienholders;
(f) A statement of contractual or other arrangements or conditions of the
broker's commission; and
(g) Other material facts relevant to the sale.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In applying and construing the Uniform Partition of Heirs Property Act, Sections 1 to
13 of this Act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law
with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.
SECTION 13. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Uniform Partition of Heirs Property Act, Sections 1 to 13 of this Act, modifies,
Page 11 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce
Act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c)
of that act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices
described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. sec. 7003(b).
SECTION 14. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 381 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The heirs property research fund is created in the State Treasury as a restricted
fund. The restricted fund shall consist of moneys deposited pursuant to Section
15 of this Act. The Kentucky Real Estate Authority created by Section 16 of this
Act shall administer the fund.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of
the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the succeeding
fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The funds deposited into the heirs property research fund shall be made available
to residents of Kentucky, upon application, in the form of a one-time grant of up
to two thousand dollars ($2,000). Grant funds shall be used to assist applicants in
conducting research into their family history, specifically relating to
identification, evaluation, preservation, partition, or sale of heirs property. Grant
funds shall only be used to:
(a) Conduct genealogical research;
(b) Conduct a property title search;
(c) Order a property appraisal;
(d) Order a property survey;
(e) Consult a real estate attorney; or
(f) Engage any other professional service or resource reasonably related to
identifying, evaluating, preserving, partitioning, or selling heirs property.
(4) The Kentucky Real Estate Authority shall prescribe, through administrative
Page 12 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, and make
available on its website, an application process and eligibility criteria for grants.
Applications for grants shall be approved based on a showing of financial need.
Section 15. KRS 64.012 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The county clerk shall receive for the following services the following fees:
(a) 1. Recording and indexing of a:
a. Deed of trust or assignment for the benefit of creditors;
b. Deed;
c. Deed of assignment;
d. File-stamped copy of documents set forth in KRS 14A.2-040(1) or
(2) that have been filed first with the Secretary of State;
e. Real estate option;
f. Power of attorney;
g. Revocation of power of attorney;
h. Lease which is recordable by law;
i. Deed of release of a mortgage or lien under KRS 382.360;
j. United States lien;
k. Release of a United States lien;
l. Release of any recorded encumbrance other than state liens;
m. Lis pendens notice concerning proceedings in bankruptcy;
n. Lis pendens notice;
o. Mechanic's and artisan's lien under KRS Chapter 376;
p. Assumed name;
q. Notice of lien issued by the Internal Revenue Service;
r. Notice of lien discharge issued by the Internal Revenue Service;
s. Original, assignment, amendment, or continuation financing
statement;
Page 13 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
t. Making a record for the establishment of a city, recording the plan
or plat thereof, and all other service incident;
u. Survey of a city, or any part thereof, or any addition to or
extensions of the boundary of a city;
v. Recording with statutory authority for which no specific fee is set,
except a military discharge;
w. Will or other probate document pursuant to KRS Chapter 392 or
394;
x. Court ordered name change pursuant to KRS Chapter 401;
y. Land use restriction according to KRS 100.3681; and
z. Filing with statutory authority for which no specific fee is set.
For all items in this subsection if the entire thereof does not exceed
five (5) pages ........................................................... $34.00[$33.00]
And, for all items in this subsection exceeding five (5) pages,
for each additional page ..........................................................$3.00
And, for all items in this subsection for each additional reference
relating to same instrument .....................................................$4.00
2. The thirty-four[thirty-three] dollar ($34)[($33)] fee imposed by this
subsection shall be divided as follows:
a. Twenty-seven dollars ($27) shall be retained by the county clerk;
[and]
b. Six dollars ($6) shall be paid to the affordable housing trust fund
established in KRS 198A.710 and shall be remitted by the county
clerk within ten (10) days following the end of the quarter in
which the fee was received. Each remittance to the affordable
housing trust fund shall be accompanied by a summary report on a
form prescribed by the Kentucky Housing Corporation; and
Page 14 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
c. One dollar ($1) shall be paid to the heirs property research fund
established in Section 14 of this Act and shall be remitted by the
county clerk within ten (10) days following the end of the quarter
in which the fee was received. Each remittance to the heirs
property research fund shall be accompanied by a summary
report on a form prescribed by the Kentucky Real Estate
Authority.
(b) For noting a security interest on a certificate of title pursuant to
KRS Chapter 186A ..................................................................................$12.00
(c) For filing the release of collateral under a financing statement
and noting same upon the face of the title pursuant to KRS Chapter
186 or 186A ...............................................................................................$5.00
(d) Filing or recording state tax or other state liens ........................................$5.00
(e) Filing release of a state tax or other state lien ...........................................$5.00
(f) Acknowledging or notarizing any deed, mortgage, power of attorney,
or other written instrument required by law for recording and certifying
same ..................................... ......................................................................$5.00
(g) Recording plats, maps, and surveys, not exceeding 24 inches by
36 inches, per page ..................................................................................$40.00
(h) Recording a bond, for each bond .............................................................$10.00
(i) Each bond required to be taken or prepared by the clerk ..........................$4.00
(j) Copy of any bond when ordered ................................................................$3.00
(k) Administering an oath and certificate thereof ...........................................$5.00
(l) Issuing a license for which no other fee is fixed by law ............................$8.00
(m) Issuing a solicitor's license ......................................................................$15.00
(n) Marriage license, indexing, recording, and issuing certificate thereof ....$26.50
(o) Every order concerning the establishment, changing, closing, or
Page 15 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
discontinuing of roads, to be paid out of the county levy when
the road is established, changed, closed, or discontinued, and by
the applicant when it is not ...............................................................$3.00
(p) Registration of licenses for professional persons required to register
with the county clerk ......................................................................$10.00
(q) Certified copy of any record ......................................................................$5.00
Plus fifty cents ($.50) per page after three (3) pages
(r) Filing certification required by KRS 65.070(2)(a) ....................................$5.00
(s) Filing notification and declaration and petition of candidates
for Commonwealth's attorney ........................................................$200.00
(t) Filing notification and declaration and petition of candidates for county
and independent boards of education .............................................$20.00
(u) Filing notification and declaration and petition of candidates for
boards of soil and water conservation districts ...............................$20.00
(v) Filing notification and declaration and petition of candidates for
other office ......................................................................................$50.00
(w) Filing declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for office ..............$50.00
(x) Filing petitions for elections, other than nominating petitions ................$50.00
(y) Notarizing any signature, per signature .....................................................$2.00
(z) Filing bond for receiving bodies under KRS 311.310 .............................$10.00
(aa) Noting the assignment of a certificate of delinquency and recording
and indexing the encumbrance under KRS 134.126 or 134.127 .............$27.00
(ab) Filing a going-out-of-business permit under KRS 365.445 .....................$50.00
(ac) Filing a renewal of a going-out-of-business permit under KRS 365.445 $50.00
(ad) Filing and processing a transient merchant permit under KRS 365.680 .$25.00
(ae) Recording and indexing a real estate mortgage:
1. For a mortgage that does not exceed thirty (30) pages ....................$63.00
Page 16 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
2. And, for a mortgage that exceeds thirty (30) pages, for each additional
page .........................................................................................$3.00
(af) Filing or recording a lien or release of lien by a consolidated local
government, urban-county government, unified local government, or city of
any class ................................................................................................$20.00
(2) The sixty-three dollar ($63) fee imposed by subsection (1)(ae) of this section shall
be divided as follows:
(a) Fifty-seven dollars ($57) shall be retained by the county clerk; and
(b) Six dollars ($6) shall be paid to the affordable housing trust fund established
in KRS 198A.710 and shall be remitted by the county clerk within ten (10)
days following the end of the quarter in which the fee was received. Each
remittance to the affordable housing trust fund shall be accompanied by a
summary report on a form prescribed by the Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(3) (a) For services related to the permanent storage of records listed in paragraphs
(a), (g), (n), and (ae) of subsection (1) of this section, the clerk shall be
entitled to receive a reimbursement of ten dollars ($10).
(b) In counties or a county containing an urban-county government, charter
county government, or unified local government:
1. This fee shall:
a. Not be paid annually to the fiscal court under KRS 64.152;
b. Not be paid to the Finance and Administration Cabinet under KRS
64.345;
c. Be accumulated and transferred to the fiscal court or the legislative
body of an urban-county government on a monthly basis within
ten (10) days following the end of the month;
d. Be maintained by the fiscal court or the legislative body of an
urban-county government in a separate bank account and
Page 17 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
accounted for in a separate fund; and
e. Not lapse to the general fund of the county or urban-county
government.
2. The moneys accumulated from this fee shall be held in perpetuity by the
fiscal court or the legislative body of an urban-county government for
the county clerk's exclusive use for:
a. Equipment related to the permanent storage of and access to
records, including deed books, binders, shelves, microfilm
equipment, and fireproof equipment;
b. Hardware for the permanent storage of and access to records,
including computers, servers, and scanners;
c. Software for the permanent storage of and access to records,
including vendor services and consumer subscription fees;
d. Personnel costs for the permanent storage of and access to records,
including overtime costs for personnel involved in the digitization
of records; and
e. Cloud storage and cybersecurity services for the permanent storage
of and access to records.
3. Notwithstanding KRS 68.275, claims by a county clerk that are for the
approved expenditures in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph shall be paid
by the county judge/executive or the chief executive officer of an urban-
county government by a warrant drawn on the fund and co-signed by the
treasurer of the county or urban-county government.
4. No later than July 1 of each year, each county fiscal court or legislative
body of an urban-county government shall submit a report to the
Legislative Research Commission detailing the receipts, expenditures,
and any amounts remaining in the fund.
Page 18 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
(c) In a county containing a consolidated local government:
1. The fee shall not:
a. Be paid to the Finance and Administration Cabinet under KRS
64.345; or
b. Lapse to the general fund of the consolidated local government.
2. The moneys accumulated from this fee shall be held in perpetuity by the
county clerk in a separate fund to be used exclusively for:
a. Equipment related to the permanent storage of and access to
records, including deed books, binders, shelves, microfilm
equipment, and fireproof equipment;
b. Hardware for the permanent storage of and access to records,
including computers, servers, and scanners;
c. Software for the permanent storage of and access to records,
including vendor services and consumer subscription fees;
d. Personnel costs for the permanent storage of and access to records,
including overtime costs for personnel involved in the digitization
of records; and
e. Cloud storage and cybersecurity services for the permanent storage
of and access to records.
3. No later than July 1 of each year, the county clerk shall submit a report
to the consolidated local government and the Legislative Research
Commission detailing the receipts, expenditures, and any amounts
remaining in the fund.
Section 16. KRS 324B.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Real Estate Authority is hereby created within the Department of
Professional Licensing.
(2) The authority shall be managed by an executive director, who shall be appointed by
Page 19 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
the secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet with prior written approval from the
Governor. The executive director shall be exempted from the classified service.
(3) The authority shall have the power and authority to:
(a) Provide appropriate attorneys, personnel staffing, and administrative support
to the Kentucky Real Estate Commission;
(b) Establish and maintain an office, meeting space, office supplies, furniture,
storage space, and any other supplies that are necessary to carry out the duties
of the authority and the Kentucky Real Estate Commission;
(c) Make available for public inspection all decisions, opinions, and
interpretations formulated or used by the authority and the Kentucky Real
Estate Commission in discharging its functions;
(d) Publicize the functions and purposes of the authority and the Kentucky Real
Estate Commission;
(e) Employ an administrative coordinator who shall carry out the administrative
functions and day-to-day operations of the Kentucky Real Estate Commission.
The administrative coordinator shall be exempted from the classified service[;
and]
(f) Enter into agreements with any state agency, political subdivision of the state,
postsecondary education institution, or other person or entity to assist with
implementation of the duties and responsibilities of the authority or, upon
request, the Kentucky Real Estate Commission; and
(g) Promulgate administrative regulations to:
1. Prescribe forms for the submission of each remittance by a county
clerk to the heirs property research fund; and
2. Create and administer an application process for grants from the heirs
property research fund and issue grants from the fund;
as required under Section 14 of this Act.
Page 20 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
Section 17. KRS 381.135 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) As used in this subsection:
1. "Ownership interest in a closely held farm corporation or partnership"
means any interest in a farm with one (1) or more of the shareholders or
partners owning twenty percent (20%) or more of the corporation or
partnership.
2. "Farm" means a tract of at least five (5) contiguous acres used for the
production of agricultural or horticultural crops including, but not
limited to, livestock, livestock products, poultry, poultry products, grain,
hay, pastures, soybeans, tobacco, timber, orchard fruits, vegetables,
flowers, or ornamental plants, including provision for dwellings for
persons and their families who are engaged in the above agricultural use
on the tract, but not including residential building development for sale
or lease to the public.
(b) A person desiring a division of land held jointly with others, a person desiring
an allotment of dower or curtesy, or a person with an ownership interest of
twenty percent (20%) or more in a closely held farm corporation or
partnership may file in the Circuit Court of the county in which the land or the
greater part thereof lies a petition containing a description of the land, a
statement of the names of those having an interest in it, and the amount of
such interest, with a prayer for the division or allotment; and, thereupon, all
persons interested in the property who have not united in the petition shall be
summoned to answer not more than twenty (20) days after service of the
summons. The written evidences of the title to the land, or copies thereof, if
there be any, must be filed with the petition.
(2) The statutory guardian of an infant or guardian or conservator of a person adjudged
mentally disabled may file or unite in the petition, in the names of, and in
Page 21 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
conjunction with such infant or mentally disabled person; and, if the petition be
against an infant or mentally disabled person the guardian or conservator may
appear and defend for them; if they fail to do so, the court shall appoint a discreet
person for that purpose.
(3) Upon such a petition by all interested in the property, or upon the expiration of
twenty (20) days after the service of a summons on all who have an interest in the
property and have not united in the petition, the court may order the division, or
allotment of dower or curtesy, according to the rights of the parties, except that if
the court determines that the property is heirs property under the Uniform
Partition of Heirs Property Act, then the partition or sale shall comply with
Sections 1 to 13 of this Act.
(4) The court shall appoint three (3) competent persons as commissioners to determine
the division or allotment of land, having a due regard for the rights of all parties
interested. Before proceeding to act, the commissioners shall take an oath to
discharge their duty impartially.
(5) The order of appointment shall fix a time and place for the meeting of the
commissioners who shall meet accordingly; but, if prevented from meeting at the
time and place so fixed, they may meet as soon thereafter as convenient, and may
adjourn to such other time and place as they may agree upon, until their duty shall
be performed.
(6) The commissioners shall equitably determine the allotment to the parties of their
respective interests in the land. A registered land surveyor shall perform the actual
survey of the land in accordance with the determination made by the
commissioners, and prepare the descriptions of the land, including all related maps,
plats, and documents, and he or she shall affix thereto his or her personal seal and
signature, unless such actual survey and the resultant description, maps, plats, and
documents pertaining to this land are already in existence. The commissioners shall
Page 22 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
make report thereof to the court, which may either confirm, set aside, or remand the
report to the commissioners for correction.
(7) If the report be confirmed, a commissioner to be appointed for the purpose shall, by
deed, convey to each party the land allotted to him.
(8) If the report be confirmed by the Circuit Court, it, together with said surveyor's
descriptions, survey and all related documents, and the applicable deeds shall be
certified by the clerk of that court to the county clerk, for record.
(9) Two (2) of the commissioners may act, if one (1) refuses or fails to do so.
(10) A party summoned may, by answer, controvert the allegations of the petition or
contest the rights claimed therein; and, thereupon, the case shall be tried and
decided as an ordinary action, but without the intervention of a jury.
(11) The costs of the action shall be apportioned among the parties in the ratio of their
interests, except that the costs arising from a contest of fact or law shall be adjudged
against the unsuccessful party.
(12) No verification of the pleadings shall be required.
(13) The commissioners and the land surveyor shall be paid a reasonable compensation,
to be taxed as costs.
(14) This section shall not affect the jurisdiction of courts of equity to make partition or
allot dower or curtesy.
Section 18. KRS 389A.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) When two (2) or more persons other than tenants by the entirety in residential
property actually occupied by them as a principal residence share title to real
estate in such manner that a conveyance by them jointly would pass a fee
simple title, any one (1) or more of them may bring an action for the sale or
division thereof in the Circuit Court of the county in which the land, or the
greater part thereof, lies, making parties defendant those owners who have not
joined as plaintiffs. A fiduciary possessing a power of sale may institute such
Page 23 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
an action against owners of interests not represented by him. Defendant
owners shall be brought before the court in the manner provided by the civil
rules whether or not a fiduciary possesses a power of sale of the defendant's
interest, but any fiduciary possessing such a power shall also be made a
defendant. The case shall be tried without a jury.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to property that the court determines is heirs
property under the Uniform Partition of Heirs Property Act. If the property
is heirs property, then the partition or sale shall comply with Sections 1 to
13 of this Act.
(2) A defendant who is under disability and for whom no fiduciary is acting shall be
represented in the action by a guardian ad litem, but in the event of sale of such
defendant's interest the court shall retain control of the proceeds of such interest
until a duly appointed and adequately bonded fiduciary or custodian pursuant to a
court order makes claim to the funds.
(3) In all such actions indivisibility of the real estate shall be presumed unless an issue
in respect thereto is raised by the pleading of any party, and if the court is satisfied
from the evidence that the property is divisible, without materially impairing the
value of any interest therein, division thereof pursuant to KRS 381.135 shall be
ordered.
(4) If a sale of all or any part of the real estate shall be ordered, the court shall refer the
matter to the master commissioner or appoint a commissioner to conduct a public
sale and convey the property upon terms of sale and disposition of the net proceeds
as may have been determined by the court.
(5) The death of any party pending the action and prior to distribution of the proceeds
of sale or setting apart a divisible share shall not affect the action but the court may
direct distribution or apportionment to the successors in interest of the decedent
upon application therefor.
Page 24 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 39
(6) If the interest of any party be one for life, or other term, in any portion of the real
estate, the court shall determine the value of such interest and direct that such party
receive a portion of the net sale proceeds or portion of the property if divisible, in
fee in satisfaction of such interest, but if any party to the action objects to such
procedure, and if the court finds that such procedure would defeat the objects and
purpose of a person not a party to the action, such as a testator, grantor or settlor,
but that sale or division is nevertheless desirable, the court shall order that the
interest of the life or term tenant shall continue as to his or her portion of the real
estate or the net proceeds of the sale thereof, in the latter case by directing that the
funds derived from the sale of that portion of the real estate in which the life or term
interest existed be paid to a trustee, appointed by and accountable to the District
Court, for reinvestment and distribution of income and principal in a manner
consistent with the instrument under which the life or term estate was created.
Page 25 of 25
XXXX 1/2/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed